Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.392

K-20 operations cooperative—Maintained by office.

The office shall maintain, in consultation with the K-20 network users, the K-20 operations cooperative, which shall be responsible for day-to-day network management, technical network status monitoring, technical problem response coordination, and other duties as agreed to by the office and the educational sectors. Funding for the K-20 operations cooperative shall be provided from the education technology revolving fund under *RCW 43.41A.105.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 719. Formerly RCW 43.41A.090.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.41A.105 was recodified as RCW 43.41.399 pursuant to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 222.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.